Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1996
Favored agent of title insurer.

A title insurer shall not participate in any transaction in which it knows that a producer of title insurance business or other person requires, directly or indirectly, or through a trustee, director, officer, agent, employee, or affiliate, as a condition, agreement, or understanding to selling or furnishing any other person a loan, loan extension, credit, sale, property, contract, lease, or service, that the other person place a title insurance policy of any kind with the title insurer or through a particular title insurance agent.

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 19.